Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 307.
Carrying of registration certificate; replacement and corrected certificates.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle nor draw a trailer or semi-trailer unless all required registration certificates are carried in some easily accessible place in the motor vehicle.

In case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a certificate, the owner of the vehicle described in it shall forthwith notify the Commissioner and remit a fee of $16.00, upon receipt of which the Commissioner shall furnish the owner with a duplicate certificate.

A corrected registration certificate shall be furnished by the Commissioner upon request and receipt of a fee of $16.00.

An operator cited for violating subsection (a) of this section with respect to a pleasure car, motorcycle, or truck that could be registered for less than 26,001 pounds shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5.00, which penalty shall be exempt from surcharges under

13 V.S.A. § 7282(a)

, if he or she is cited within the 14 days following the expiration of the motor vehicle’s registration.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 276

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 51

, § 13;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2009, No. 50

, § 39;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 60

, § 31.

§ 308.
Suspension, revocation, and denial of registration; reinstatement fee.

The Commissioner may suspend or revoke the registration of any motor vehicle registered in this State and repossess the number plates assigned to it, when he or she is satisfied that:

the vehicle has been stolen and that the registrant does not have legal title;

the vehicle is in such poor mechanical condition as to make its operation and use a menace or danger;

the vehicle is operated without proper equipment after the owner has been notified to procure and use such equipment as is required by law or Department rules;

the owner of the motor vehicle has perpetrated some fraud upon the Department of Motor Vehicles;

the owner of the motor vehicle is a habitual user of alcohol to excess;

the number plates were erroneously issued;

suspension or revocation is authorized under any other provision of law; or

the commercial motor carrier responsible for safety of the vehicle has been prohibited from operating by a federal agency.

The Commissioner shall deny registration if the applicant fails to disclose material information required, or if the applicant has made a materially false statement on the application, or if the applicant’s business is operated, managed, or otherwise controlled or affiliated with a person who is ineligible for registration, including the applicant entity, a relative, family member, corporate officer, or shareholder. A person whose privilege to operate has been suspended in accordance with subsection 3009(b) or 3103(b) of this title or section 110 of this title where the payments were due pursuant to section 3015 or 3106 of this title shall be ineligible for registration. The Department shall deny registration for a vehicle that has been assigned for safety to a commercial motor carrier who has been prohibited from operating by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or a carrier whose business is operated, managed, or otherwise controlled or affiliated with a person who is ineligible for registration, including the owner, a relative, family member, corporate officer, or shareholder.

Prior to terminating the revocation of a registration or reinstating a registration following suspension, the Commissioner shall require payment of a fee equivalent to the fee prescribed in section 675 of this title, except that no such fee shall be imposed if the registration was suspended or revoked following its erroneous issuance by the Commissioner. This fee shall be in addition to any other fee that may be required by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 39

, § 1;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 309.
Registering motor vehicle of which applicant is not the owner.

A person who registers or attempts to register a motor vehicle, snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or motorboat of which he or she is not the bona fide owner, as defined in section 4 of this title, shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 69

, § 2;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 144.

§ 310.
Loaning or permitting the use of number plates.

A person shall not loan or permit the use of the number plates assigned by the Commissioner to a motor vehicle owned by such person.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 311.
Permits for nonregisterable vehicles.

The Commissioner, for an annual fee of $2.00 and under such conditions as he or she may prescribe, may permit licensed operators to operate motor vehicles not otherwise registerable across a public highway; however, an unlicensed person may so operate a motorized wheelchair or an electric personal assistive mobility device as defined by this title without obtaining a permit.

[Repealed.]

The Commissioner may permit the operation of a specially equipped motor vehicle, not otherwise registerable, by a person with a disability who holds an operator’s license permitting the operation of that vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 46

, §§ 1, 2, eff. April 19, 1963; amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

1977, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 29, 1978;

1983, No. 5

;

1989, No. 51

, § 14;

2001, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 143.

§ 312.
Temporary registration pending issuance of certificate of title.

In his or her discretion, the Commissioner may issue a temporary registration certificate to a person required to obtain a certificate of title in accordance with chapter 21 of this title upon payment of the registration fee provided in subchapter 2 of this chapter and of the title fee. The temporary registration certificate and the number plate shall be valid for 60 days and shall not be renewed. At the expiration of the temporary registration, a permanent registration certificate and a set of number plates shall be issued, provided that all documents and information required by law are filed with the Commissioner.

The registration fee paid in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall not be refunded, except that the fee shall be deemed the fee for the permanent registration, if one is issued, or shall be deemed the fee for an application to register another vehicle, if the title requirements are met during that registration period. Likewise, the title fee shall be deemed the fee for the title, if one is issued, or shall be deemed the fee for an application to title another vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 49

, eff. April 15, 1975; amended

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2017, No. 71

, § 5.

§ 313.
Commercial vehicle operation; denial of registration.

The Commissioner is authorized to refuse registration if a commercial motor vehicle is being operated by a commercial motor carrier that has been prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by an agency with authority to do so under federal law.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 26

, § 2.

§ 314.
Commercial motor vehicles; registration; suspension or revocation.

The Commissioner is authorized to suspend or revoke the registration of a commercial motor vehicle if the commercial motor carrier responsible for safety has been prohibited from operating in interstate commerce by an agency with authority to do so under federal law.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 26

, § 3.